src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Xenir
+V+Inf:enir # ;
+V:en PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past:enu PartEndings ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:ien # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:ieng # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:iegn # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:iengn # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:ieign # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:iens # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:iengs # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:iegns # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:iengns # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:ieigns # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:ient # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:iengt # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:iegnt # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:iengnt # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:ieignt # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:enons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:enez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:ienent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:iengent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:iegnent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:iengnent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:ieignent # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:in # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:enis # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:int # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:enimes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:enistes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:indrent # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:inrent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:eneie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:eneies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:eneit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:eniiens # ; ! Guess
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:eniiez # ; ! Guess
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:enent # ; ! Guess

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:endrai # ; 
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:endras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:endrat # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:endrons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:endrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:endreiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:endront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:iegne # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:ieigne # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:ienge # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:iengne # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:egne # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:iegnes # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:ieignes # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:ienges # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:iengnes # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:egnes # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:iegnet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:ieignet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:ienget # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:iengnet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:egnet # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:iegniens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:iengiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:ieigniens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:iengniens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:engiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:iegnions # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:iengions # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:ieignions # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:iengnions # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:engions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:iegniez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:iengiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:ieigniez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:iengniez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:engiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:ent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:iegnent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:ieignent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:iengent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:iengnent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:egnent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:enisse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:enisses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:enisst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:enissons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:enissiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:enistes # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:enissent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:endroie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:endroies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:endroit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:endrions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:endriez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:endrient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:ien # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:enons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:enez # ;

LEXICON Aler
+V+Inf:al%>er # ;
+V:al%> PresPart ;
+V:al%> PastPart ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:vois # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Ind:vai # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:vais # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:vas # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:vait # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:vet # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:va # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:alons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:alez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:vont # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:al%>ai # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:al%>as # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:al%>a%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:al%>ames # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:al%>astes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:al%>erent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:al%>eie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:al%>eies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:al%>eit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:al%>iiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:al%>iiez # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:al%>eient # ;

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:irai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:iras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:ira%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:irons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:irez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:ireiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:iront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:voise # ;
+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:aille # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:voises # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:ailles # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:voiset # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:voist # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:aillet # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:voisons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:aillons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:voisez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:ailliez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:voisent # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:aillent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:al%>asse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:al%>asses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:al%>ast # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:al%>issons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:al%>issiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:al%>issez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:al%>issiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:al%>isseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:al%>assent # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Cond:ireie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:ireis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:ireit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond:iriiens # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond:iriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:ireient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:va # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Imp:vas # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:alons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:alez # ;

LEXICON Veoir
+V+Inf:veoir # ;
+V+Inf:vedeir # ;
+V+Inf:voir # ;
+V:ven PresPart ;
+V:ve PresPart ;
+V:vei PresPart ;
+V+Part+Past:veü # ;
+V+Part+Past:vis PartEndings ;

+V+1s+Pres+Ind:vei # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Ind:veiz # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Ind:veit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Ind:veons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Ind:veez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Ind:veient # ;

+V+1s+SPast+Ind:vi # ;
+V+2s+SPast+Ind:veïs # ;
+V+3s+SPast+Ind:vit # ;
+V+1p+SPast+Ind:veïmes # ;
+V+2p+SPast+Ind:veïstes # ;
+V+3p+SPast+Ind:virent # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Ind:veie # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Ind:veies # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind:veit # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Ind:veiiens # ; ! Verify
+V+2p+Ipfv+Ind:veeiz # ; ! Verify
+V+3p+Ipfv+Ind:veeient # ; ! Verify

+V+1s+Fut+Ind:verrai # ;
+V+2s+Fut+Ind:verras # ;
+V+3s+Fut+Ind:verra%{T%} # ;
+V+1p+Fut+Ind:verrons # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:verrez # ;
+V+2p+Fut+Ind:verreiz # ;
+V+3p+Fut+Ind:verrront # ;

+V+1s+Pres+Sbjv:veie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Sbjv:veies # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Sbjv:veiet # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:veons # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:veiiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Sbjv:veiions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:veez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Sbjv:veiiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Sbjv:voient # ;

+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv:veïsse # ;
+V+2s+Ipfv+Sbjv:veïsses # ;
+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv:veïst # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:veïssons # ;
+V+1p+Ipfv+Sbjv:veïssiens # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:veïssez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:veïssiez # ;
+V+2p+Ipfv+Sbjv:veïsseiz # ;
+V+3p+Ipfv+Sbjv:veïssent # ;

! Verify
+V+1s+Pres+Cond:verreie # ;
+V+2s+Pres+Cond:verreis # ;
+V+3s+Pres+Cond:verreit # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:verriiens # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:verriions # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Early:verriiez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Cond+Gram/Late:verriiez # ;
+V+3p+Pres+Cond:verreient # ;

+V+2s+Pres+Imp:voi # ;
+V+1p+Pres+Imp:veons # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:veez # ;
+V+2p+Pres+Imp:vez # ;
