src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
aler: Aler          "to go" ;
veoir: Veoir        "to see" ;
venir:v Xenir       "to come, to go" ;
tenir:t Xenir       "to keep, to hold" ;
convenir:conv Xenir   "to gather, to be necessary" ;
    convenir:cov Xenir "to gather, to be necessary" ;
